Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB354.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1725-A(a)(3) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 1725-A. Funding for Charter Schools.--(a) Funding for a charter school shall be provided in the following manner:* * *(3) For the 1997-1998 school year through the 2024-2025 school year, for special education students, the charter school shall receive for each student enrolled the same funding as for each non-special education student as provided in clause (2), 123456789101112131415161718192021 plus an additional amount determined by dividing the district of residence's total special education expenditure by the product of multiplying the combined percentage of section 2509.5(k) times the district of residence's total average daily membership for the prior school year. This amount shall be paid by the district of residence of each student.(3.1) (i) For the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter, for special education students, the charter school shall receive for each student enrolled an amount which shall be paid by the district of residence of each student to be determined as follows:(A) For each special education student enrolled in the charter school for which the annual expenditure is in Category 1 as reported to the department under section 1372(8) multiply the same funding as for each non-special education student as provided in clause (2) by one and fifty-one hundredths (1.51).(B) For each special education student enrolled in the charter school for which the annual expenditure is in Category 2 as reported to the department under section 1372(8) multiply the same funding as for each non-special education student as provided in clause (2) by three and seventy-seven hundredths (3.77).(C) For each special education student enrolled in the charter school for which the annual expenditure is in Category 3 as reported to the department under section 1372(8) multiply the same funding as for each non-special education student as provided in clause (2) by seven and forty-six hundredths (7.46). For purposes of this paragraph, Category 3 shall be the sum of students reported in Categories 3A and 3B under section 1372(8).(ii) Pursuant to guidelines developed by the department, to 20250SB0354PN0292 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be eligible to receive funding for special education students under subclause (i), the charter school must document the cost of providing an education to the student and provide the documentation to the department and the school district of residence.(iii) Each weight provided in subclause (i)(A), (B) and (C) shall be updated whenever the weights in section 2509.5(bbb)(2)(i) are adjusted for school districts.(iv) In no case shall the calculation made in subclause (i)(A) and (B) result in a payment that exceeds the maximum amount within the category's dollar range and in no case shall the calculation in subclause (i)(C) result in a payment that exceeds the actual cost of providing an education to the student as determined under subclause (ii). Should the actual cost of providing an education to a student in Category 3 be less than the amount the charter school received for the student, the charter school shall return to the district of residence any overage it received for that student by no later than February 1 of each year.(v) Upon submission of the report required under section 1372(8), the charter school shall calculate the difference between the amount received for special education from school districts and the amount expended to provide special education programs and services. In the event the charter school's expenses for special education are less than the total amount it received from school districts for special education, the overpayment shall be returned to the school districts on a pro rata basis by no later than February 1, 2025, and February 1 of each year thereafter pursuant to guidelines developed by the department.20250SB0354PN0292 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 2. Section 1732-A(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 1732-A. Provisions Applicable to Charter Schools.--(a) Charter schools shall be subject to the following:Sections 108, 110, 111, 321, 325, 326, 327, 431, 436, 443, 510, 518, 527, 708, 736, 737, 738, 739, 740, 741, 752, 753, 755, 771, 776, 777, 808, 809, 810, 1109, 1111, 1112(a), 1301, 1310, 1317, 1317.1, 1317.2, 1318, 1326, 1327, 1327.2, 1329, 1330, 1332, 1333, 1333.1, 1333.2, 1333.3, 1372, 1303-A, 1513, 1517, 1518, 1521, 1523, 1531, 1547, 2014-A, Article XIII-A and Article XIV.Act of July 17, 1961 (P.L.776, No.341), known as the "Pennsylvania Fair Educational Opportunities Act."Act of July 19, 1965 (P.L.215, No.116), entitled "An act providing for the use of eye protective devices by persons engaged in hazardous activities or exposed to known dangers in schools, colleges and universities."Section 4 of the act of January 25, 1966 (1965 P.L.1546, No.541), entitled "An act providing scholarships and providing funds to secure Federal funds for qualified students of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania who need financial assistance to attend postsecondary institutions of higher learning, making an appropriation, and providing for the administration of this act."Act of July 12, 1972 (P.L.765, No.181), entitled "An act relating to drugs and alcohol and their abuse, providing for projects and programs and grants to educational agencies, other public or private agencies, institutions or organizations."[Act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1595, No.175), known as the "Antihazing Law."]20250SB0354PN0292 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 28 (relating to antihazing) and 42 Pa.C.S. § 5803(a)(3.1) (relating to asset forfeiture).* * *Section 3. Section 1749-A(a)(1)(xlix) of the act, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55) and reenacted and amended October 31, 2024 (P.L.1129, No.135), is amended to read:Section 1749-A. Applicability of other provisions of this act and of other acts and regulations.(a) General requirements.--Cyber charter schools shall be subject to the following:(1) The following:* * *(xlix) Section [1372(8)] 1372.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0354PN0292 - 5 - 123456789101112131415